Vermont, session 2025-2026, H844.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 9741(26) is amended to read:
(26)(A) Sales of electricity, oil, gas, and other fuels used in a residence
for all domestic use, including heating, but not including fuel sold at retail in
free-standing containers, or sold as part of a transaction where a free-standing
container is exchanged without a separate charge. Wood pellets sold to an
VT LEG #386389 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.844
2026 Page 2 of 4
individual on the vendor’s premises or delivered to an individual’s residence
shall be presumed to be purchased for residential use and shall be exempt sales
under this subdivision (26) unless the vendor knew or ought reasonably to have
known that the wood pellets were not purchased for residential use. A
certificate of exemption shall not be required for exempt retail sales of wood
pellets to an individual. The Commissioner shall by rule determine that
portion of the sales attributable to domestic use where fuels are used for
purposes in addition to domestic use.
(B) As used in this subdivision (26), “residence” means any
residential property that has not:
(i) had an occupancy subject to the short-term rental surcharge
under section 9301 of this title in past 12 months; or
(ii) been occupied by the owner for fewer than 183 days in the
past 12 months.
Sec. 2. 32 V.S.A. chapter 233, subchapter 5 is added to read:
Subchapter 5. Residential Fuels Surcharge
§ 9821. SURCHARGE ON CERTAIN RESIDENTIAL FUEL
TRANSACTIONS; IMPOSITION
(a) A vendor shall collect a surcharge of three percent of the sales price
charged for retail sales of electricity, oil, gas, and other fuels used in a
VT LEG #386389 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.844
2026 Page 3 of 4
residence for all domestic use, provided the sale is to a residential property that
has:
(1) had an occupancy subject to the short-term rental surcharge under
section 9301 of this title in past 12 months; or
(2) been occupied by the owner for fewer than 183 days in the past 12
months.
(b) All sales exempt from sales and use tax under subdivision 9741(26) of
this chapter shall be exempt from the surcharge imposed under this section.
(c) The surcharge shall be in addition to any tax assessed under section
9771 of this chapter. The surcharge assessed under this section shall be paid,
collected, remitted, and enforced under this chapter in the same manner as the
sales tax assessed under section 9771 of this chapter.
(d) Revenue from the surcharge imposed under this section shall be
deposited in the Home Weatherization Assistance Fund under 33 V.S.A.
§ 2501.
Sec. 3. 33 V.S.A. § 2501 is amended to read:
§ 2501. HOME WEATHERIZATION ASSISTANCE FUND
* * *
(b) The Fund shall be composed of the receipts from the gross receipts tax
on retail sales of fuel imposed by section 2503 of this title, receipts from the
surcharge on retail sales of certain residential fuels imposed by 32 V.S.A.
VT LEG #386389 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.844
2026 Page 4 of 4
§ 9821, such funds as may be allocated from the Oil Overcharge Fund, such
funds as may be allocated from the federal Low Income Energy Assistance
Program, such funds as may be deposited or transferred into the Fund by the
Vermont Low Income Trust for Electricity, and such other funds as may be
appropriated by the General Assembly.
* * *
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on August 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386389 v.1